Wyoming, session 2025, SF0078.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-9-104 by creating a new subsection
(e) is amended to read:
22-9-104. How to apply; information required.
(e) No person, except a county clerk, the secretary
of state or their designees, shall distribute an absentee
ballot request form to any qualified elector unless that
qualified elector specifically solicits an absentee ballot
request form. For purposes of this subsection, "absentee
ballot request form" includes any document that claims to
be or that is deceptively similar to an official election
document and that is provided to the qualified elector by
mail, email or any other means.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0078
ENROLLED ACT NO. 10, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2